Missouri, session 2026, HB2706.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 208, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 208.019, to read as follows:
208.019. 1. The director of the department of social services shall prepare and
submit a request for a waiver to the United States Department of Agriculture to
authorize the state to operate the supplemental nutrition assistance program (SNAP) in
a manner that prioritizes healthy foods and nutritional value, discourages foods that are
high in added sugar and ultra processed, and supports Missouri agriculture.
2. Alterations made under the waiver, if received, shall be designed to support
the purchase of a wide variety of whole and minimally processed healthy food categories
including, but not limited to:
(1) Fresh fruits and vegetables;
(2) Meat, fish, poultry, and other proteins;
(3) Dairy products;
(4) Whole grains and bread products; and
(5) Legumes.
3. The director of the department of social services shall explore and recommend
other strategies to further incentivize the purchase of fresh fruits, vegetables, and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2706 2
Missouri-produced meat and dairy products within the SNAP program by utilizing and
enhancing existing Missouri healthy food education and access programs.
✔